Maryland, session 2025, HB0818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0818*

HOUSE BILL 818
SUBTITLE 26. AWARD OF ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPENSES – VIOLATION OF
MARYLAND CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHT.
3–2601.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A COURT MAY
AWARD TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND
EXPENSES FOR ANY CLAIM FOR RELIEF AGAINST THE STATE, ANY POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, OR AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF THE STATE OR ANY
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE IF THE CLAIM FOR RELIEF SEEKS TO
REMEDY A VIOLATION OF A RIGHT THAT IS SECURED BY THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS.
(B) A COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPENSES
TO A PREVAILING DEFENDANT ONLY ON A FINDING THAT THE CLAIM FOR RELIEF
BROUGHT BY THE PLAINTIFF TO REMEDY A VIOLATION OF A RIGHT THAT IS SECURED
BY THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS
WAS MAINTAINED IN BAD FAITH OR WITHOUT SUBSTANTIAL JUSTIFICATION.
3–2602.
FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A COURT SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER TO
AWARD ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPENSES BY CONSIDERING THE FACTORS LISTED IN
MARYLAND RULE 2–703(F)(3).
Article – State Government
12–109.
[Counsel] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 3–2601 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE,
COUNSEL may not charge or receive fees that exceed:
(1) 20% of a settlement made under this subtitle; or
(2) 25% of a judgment made under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any case filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.